Idaho statutes. Title 21 AERONAUTICS
Chapter 1 AERONAUTICS ADMINISTRATION
§ 21-120. Department orders — Notice and opportunity for hearings — Judicial review.

Every order of the department requiring performance of certain acts or compliance with certain requirements and any denial or revocation of an approval, certificate or license shall set forth the reasons and shall state the acts to be done or requirements to be met before approval by the department will be given or the approval, license or certificate granted or restored or the order modified or changed. Orders issued by the department pursuant to the provisions of this act shall be served upon the persons affected either by registered mail or in person. In every case where notice and opportunity for hearing are required under the provisions of this act, the order of the department shall, on not less than twenty (20) days’ notice, specify a time when and place where the person affected may be heard, or the time within which he may request [a] hearing, and such order shall become effective upon the expiration of the time for exercising such opportunity for hearing, unless a hearing is held or requested within the time provided, in which case the order shall be suspended until the department shall affirm, disaffirm, or modify such order after hearing held or default by the person affected. To the extent practicable, hearings on such orders shall be held in the county where the affected person resides or does business. Any person aggrieved by an order of the department or by the grant, denial or revocation of any approval, license or certificate may have the action of the department reviewed by the district court of the county in which the aggrieved person resides or has his principal place of business.

History.

1947, ch. 153, § 20, p. 378.

§ 21-121. Penalties — General and special.

General. Any person violating any of the provisions of this act, or any of the rules, regulations or orders issued pursuant thereto, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Special. For any violation of section 21-112[, Idaho Code], in addition to, or in lieu of, the penalties provided by subsection (a) of this section, or as a condition to the suspension of a sentence which may be imposed pursuant thereto, the court in its discretion may revoke or suspend the violator’s registration certificates for such period as it may determine but not to exceed one (1) year. Violation of the duly imposed prohibition of the court may be treated as a separate offense under this section or as a contempt of court. Upon a plea of guilty or conviction under section 21-112[, Idaho Code,] in any case involving a registrant under section 21-114[, Idaho Code], the court shall cause a notation of such plea or conviction and of the sentence imposed to be marked upon the pilot certificate or other evidence of pilot registration or receipt provided by the department under said section 21-114[, Idaho Code]. In no event shall this subsection be construed as warrant for the court or any other agency or person to take away, impound, hold or mark any federal airman or aircraft certificate, permit, rating or license, or to take away, impound or hold any state registration certificate or other evidence of such registration or payment of fees.

History.

1947, ch. 153, § 21, p. 378.

§ 21-122. Exchange of violations information.

The department is authorized to report to the appropriate federal agencies and agencies of other states all proceedings instituted charging violation of sections 21-112 and 21-113[, Idaho Code,] and all penalties, of which it has knowledge, imposed upon airmen or the owners or operators of aircraft for violations of the rules, regulations or orders of the department. The department is authorized to receive reports of penalties and other data from agencies of the federal government and other states and, when necessary, to enter into agreements with federal agencies and the agencies of other states governing the delivery, receipt, exchange, and use of reports and data. The department may make the reports and data of the federal agencies, the agencies of other states, and the courts of this state available, with or without request therefor, to any and all courts of this state, and to any officer of the state or of a municipality authorized pursuant to section 21-119[, Idaho Code,] to enforce the aeronautics laws.

History.

1947, ch. 153, § 22, p. 378.

§ 21-123. Separability.

If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance shall be held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect the provisions of [or] application of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.

History.

1947, ch. 153, § 23, p. 378.

§ 21-124. Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Uniform State Aeronautics Department Act.”

History.

1947, ch. 153, § 25, p. 378.

§ 21-125 — 21-130. [Reserved.]

This act shall be known and cited as the “Aeronautical Administration Act of 1970.”

History.

1970, ch. 257, § 1, p. 683.

§ 21-132. Declaration of purpose.

It is hereby found and declared that there exists in the state of Idaho a need to improve and expand air service capabilities to meet the increased demands of air transportation. In view of the rapid growth of this mode of passenger transportation, faster and heavier aircraft, the anticipated use of this system by industry for moving high value goods and merchandise in a minimum of time, to save handling and warehousing, planning to meet future needs is imperative. Such planning must accommodate intrastate and interstate service for passengers and freight into the national system, with implementation as rapidly as possible. The efforts of both the public and private sectors must be combined to match the aviation program planned by congress for the new millennium.

History.

1970, ch. 257, § 2, p. 683; am. 1974, ch. 12, § 98, p. 61; am. 2001, ch. 377, § 1, p. 1319.

§ 21-133. Department of Aeronautics. [Repealed.]

§ 21-134. Idaho aeronautics advisory board created — Duties — Compensation.

There is hereby created and established the Idaho aeronautics advisory board. The board shall consult with and advise the Idaho transportation department on matters concerning aeronautics. Members shall be compensated as provided by section 59-509(h), Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 21-134, as added by 1974, ch. 12, § 99, p. 61; am. 1980, ch. 247, § 7, p. 582; am 1982, ch. 95, § 131, p. 185; am. 1989, ch. 228, § 1, p. 543; am. 1994, ch. 128, § 1, p. 286; am. 2001, ch. 377, § 2, p. 1319.

§ 21-135. Composition of advisory board — Number — Appointment — Qualifications.

The advisory board shall be composed of five (5) members to be appointed by the governor. All members shall be knowledgeable and have experience in aviation; provided however, one (1) member shall have particular knowledge of commercial aviation; one (1) member shall have knowledge of general aviation; one (1) member shall have particular knowledge of back-country aviation; and one (1) member shall have particular knowledge of air freight transportation. Not more than three (3) members thereof shall at any time belong to the same political party. Provided, however, two (2) members of the advisory board shall be licensed pilots. Members shall be successful public spirited citizens of good character, well informed and interested in the construction and maintenance of aeronautical facilities. Selection and appointment shall be made solely with regard to the best interests of the various functions of the advisory board. Each member at the time of his appointment shall be a citizen and resident taxpayer of the state of Idaho, and of the members appointed to represent director districts, such member shall be a resident of the district from which he is appointed for at least three (3) years.

History.

1970, ch. 257, § 5, p. 683; am. 1974, ch. 12, § 100, p. 61; am. 1993, ch. 274, § 1, p. 926; am. 2001, ch. 377, § 3, p. 1319.

§ 21-136. Appointment of members — Term — Vacancies.

For the purposes of selection of members of the advisory board of aeronautics, one (1) member shall be appointed to represent director districts no. 1 and 2, one (1) member to represent director districts no. 3 and 4, one (1) member to represent director districts no. 5 and 6, as provided in section 40-303, Idaho Code, and two (2) members shall be appointed from the state at-large.

The governor shall appoint, subject to confirmation by the senate, the board members for terms of five (5) years. The initial terms of the at-large members may be less than five (5) years, and shall be staggered so that not more than (1) term of any member of the board shall expire in any one (1) year. The term of each member shall begin immediately upon his appointment and qualification. Each member shall hold office after the expiration of his term until his successor has been appointed. Not less than fifteen (15) days before the expiration of the term of appointment of each member, the governor shall appoint a successor and submit the appointment to the senate for confirmation. Should any member of the board resign, die, remove from the district from which he was appointed, or otherwise be removed from office, a vacancy shall exist, and during the recess of the legislature, the governor shall within thirty (30) days appoint a successor with like qualifications, to serve for the remainder of the retiring member’s unexpired term. If a vacancy occurs within forty-five (45) days after the convening of the legislature and while it is still in session, the governor shall make and submit to the senate for its approval a nomination to fill the vacancy.

History.

1970, ch. 257, § 6, p. 683; am. 1974, ch. 12, § 101, p. 61; am. 1985, ch. 253, § 3, p. 586; am. 1989, ch. 228, § 2, p. 543; am. 1996, ch. 35, § 1, p. 88; am. 2001, ch. 377, § 4, p. 1319.

§ 21-137. Certificates of members — Oath — Political affiliation — Bond.

Each member of the board shall receive a certificate of appointment from the governor, and before entering upon the discharge of his official duties, shall file with the secretary of state the constitutional oath of office, to which and as a part thereof shall be added a declaration of the political party to which said board member belongs. Each member shall be bonded in the time, form and manner prescribed in chapter 8, title 59, Idaho Code.

History.

1970, ch. 257, § 7, p. 683.

§ 21-138. Members serve at pleasure of governor.

Members shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.

History.

1970, ch. 257, § 8, p. 683.

§ 21-139 — 21-141. Board of aeronautical directors — Compensation — Election — Terms. [Repealed.]

§ 21-142. Powers and duties of board.

The Idaho transportation board shall be vested with the functions, powers and duties relating to the provisions of this act and shall have power to:

Contract in the name of the state with respect to the rights, powers and duties vested in the board by this act.

Locate, design, construct, reconstruct, alter, extend, repair and maintain state aeronautical facilities when determined by the board to be in the public interest.

Establish standards for the location, design, construction, reconstruction, alteration, extension, repair and maintenance of state aeronautical facilities.

Make annually on or before the first day of December of each year, and at such other times as the governor may require, reports in writing to the governor concerning the condition, management and financial transactions of the transportation department.

Purchase, condemn or otherwise acquire, and exchange any real property, either in fee or in any lesser estate or interest, rights-of-way, easements and other rights together with rights of direct access from the property abutting aeronautical facilities, deemed necessary by the board for present or future aeronautical purposes. The order of the board that the land sought is necessary for such use shall be prima facie evidence of such fact.

Cooperate with, receive and expend grants from the federal government, and receive and expend gifts and grants from other sources for the construction and improvement of any aeronautical facility and, when authorized or directed by any act of congress or any rule or regulation of any agency of the federal government, expend funds so donated or granted.

Contract jointly with counties, municipalities and other public agencies for the improvement and construction of aeronautical facilities.

Expend funds for the construction, maintenance and improvement of publicly owned aeronautical facilities.

Prescribe rules and regulations affecting aeronautical facilities, and enforce compliance therewith.

Cooperate financially or otherwise with any other state, county or city of any other state, or with any foreign country or any province or district of any foreign country, or with the government of the United States, or any agency thereof, or private agencies or persons, or with any or all thereof for the erecting, constructing, reconstructing, and maintaining of any aeronautical facility between the state of Idaho and any other state or foreign country, and for the purchase or condemnation or other acquisition of right-of-way therefor.

Close or restrict the use of any state aeronautical facility whenever such closing or restricting of use is deemed necessary.

Establish such departmental divisions as are necessary for the full and efficient administration of this act.

Employ such personnel as are necessary, subject to the provisions of the public employee retirement system (chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code), group insurance plan (chapter 57, title 67, Idaho Code), or personnel system (chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code).

Sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of and convey, in accordance with law, any real or personal property, other than public lands which by the constitution and laws of the state of Idaho are placed under the jurisdiction of the state land board, or parts thereof, together with appurtenances when, in the opinion of the board, said real property and/or appurtenances are no longer needed for state aeronautical purposes, and also dispose of any surplus materials and by-products from such property and appurtenances.
(15) Establish rules and regulations, consistent with the laws of Idaho, for the expenditure of all moneys appropriated and/or allotted by law to the Idaho transportation department or the board.

(16) Exercise such other powers and duties, including the adoption of bylaws, rules and regulations, necessary to fully implement and carry out the provisions of this act and the provisions of title 21, Idaho Code, not inconsistent herewith.

History.

1970, ch. 257, § 12, p. 683; am. 1974, ch. 12, § 102, p. 61; am. 2018, ch. 169, § 1, p. 344.

§ 21-143 — 21-145. State director of aeronautics — Oath — Bond — Functions. [Repealed.]

§ 21-146. Funds, appropriations and other moneys for the department of aeronautics transferred to control of Idaho transportation board.

All funds, appropriations and other moneys from whatever source, now or hereafter appropriated and/or provided by law for the administration of the functions, powers and duties of the department of aeronautics and/or the board including those of the state aeronautics fund, shall be and the same hereby are, respectively, transferred, made available to and placed under the control of the Idaho transportation board and appropriated for expenditure by it and shall be paid out by the state treasurer in the manner provided by the constitution and the laws of the state of Idaho. The said “state aeronautics fund” shall be in all respects the same “state aeronautics fund” as hereafter provided by law, and which said fund shall be and remain in full force and effect.

History.

1970, ch. 257, § 16, p. 683; am. 1974, ch. 12, § 103, p. 61.

§ 21-147. Continuation of existing statutes — Effect.

The statutes of the state of Idaho now governing the administration, construction, maintenance, development and regulation of aeronautical facilities within the state, except where the same conflict with or are superseded by this act, shall continue with full force and effect, except that wherever the words “department of aeronautics,” “Idaho board of aeronautical directors,” “director of aeronautics” and the “state director of aeronautics” are used in the statutes of the state with respect to the administration, construction, maintenance, development and regulation of aeronautical facilities, the same shall be read and construed to mean, respectively, the “Idaho transportation board” and/or the “director of the Idaho transportation department,” as the case may be. The Idaho transportation board shall be the successor in law to all contractual obligations entered into by its predecessors in law.

History.

1970, ch. 257, § 17, p. 683; am. 1974, ch. 12, § 104, p. 61.

§ 21-148. Continuation of rights and privileges of present employees — Effect.

Nothing herein contained shall affect the rights or privileges of employees of the present department of aeronautics under the public employee retirement system (chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code), group insurance plan (chapter 57, title 67, Idaho Code), or personnel system (chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code).

History.

1970, ch. 257, § 18, p. 683; am. 2018, ch. 169, § 2, p. 344.

§ 21-149. Conflicts with other laws.

Whenever any provisions of the existing laws of the state or of any laws enacted at the fortieth session [1969, 1970] of the Idaho legislature, are in conflict with the provisions of this act, it is the declared intention of the legislature that the provisions of this act shall control and supersede all such laws.

History.

1970, ch. 257, § 19, p. 683.

§ 21-150. Violations — Penalty.

Any person who shall violate or aid in the violation of any of the provisions of this act, unless a different penalty be prescribed by law, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof be punished by a fine of not more than three hundred dollars ($300) or imprisonment for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days or both such fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court, and all fines collected for violation of this act shall be paid ten percent (10%) into the state’s general fund and ninety percent (90%) into the state aeronautics fund.

History.

1970, ch. 257, § 21, p. 683.

§ 21-131. Short title.